Maryland, session 2026, SB0979.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
5–106.
(KK) A PROSECUTION OR SUIT FOR ENFORCEMENT OF A LOCAL CONSUMER
PROTECTION CODE FOR WHICH EQUITABLE RELIEF, A FINE, OR A PENALTY IS
PROVIDED SHALL BE INSTITUTED WITHIN 3 YEARS AFTER LOCAL AUTHORITIES
KNEW OR REASONABLY SHOULD HAVE KNOWN OF THE VIOLATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0979*